Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 4 Alcoholic Beverages Generally — Permits
3-4-606. Wholesalers — Additional requirements.

(a)

In addition to any restriction or requirement now imposed by law or by valid rule promulgated in accordance with law, the following persons shall not be eligible hereafter to receive, obtain, or be granted any wholesale liquor permit:

(1)

Any individual person who is not a citizen and bona fide resident of the State of Arkansas and who has not been domiciled in the State of Arkansas continuously for at least five (5) years next preceding the date of his or her application for permit;

(2)

Any corporation in which any officer, director, manager, or stockholder of which would be ineligible as an individual person to obtain a permit by reason of the foregoing provisions of subdivision (a)(1) of this section or by reason of any other existing restriction or provision of law or valid rule promulgated in accordance with law; or

(3)

Any partnership, any of whose members or manager would be ineligible as an individual to obtain such permit by reason of the provisions of subdivision (a)(1) of this section or of any other provisions of law or valid rule as aforesaid.

(b)(1)

Any corporation which shall apply for a wholesale liquor permit shall, at the time of filing, attach thereto a list of its stockholders, managers, directors, and officers on such form as may be prescribed by the officer or authority issuing the permit, verified by the president and secretary and showing the names, addresses, and places of residence of all such persons for the five (5) years next preceding the date of application.

(2)

When the residence or address of any such stockholder, manager, director, or officer is changed, the change shall be reported by the corporation to such officer or authority within ten (10) days thereafter.

(3)

No stock in any corporation holding a permit shall be issued or transferred to any ineligible individual, except in the case of transfer by reason of death of a stockholder. In that event, the transfer by death to any ineligible individual shall be reported by the corporation to the issuing officer or authority not later than sixty (60) days after the death. If within six (6) months thereafter the stock transferred by death shall not have been transferred by bona fide transaction to an individual otherwise eligible to receive the permit as provided herein, and as provided by existing law or rule, as aforesaid, the permit of the corporation shall immediately be revoked and cancelled.

(c)

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any stock owned in any company legally operating in the State of Arkansas on June 7, 1951.

(d)(1)

Any wholesale liquor permit that may be issued to any individual, partnership, or corporation which shall be found thereafter ineligible as provided in this section, or as otherwise provided by law or rule, shall be cancelled and revoked.

(2)

If any individual, partnership, or corporation shall not comply fully with the provisions hereof, any permit theretofore issued shall be cancelled and revoked.

(e)

This section shall not apply to any person, firm, or corporation which, for a period of at least ten (10) years prior to June 7, 1951, had continuously been the holder of a wholesale liquor permit issued by this state.

(f)

This section shall be cumulative to existing restrictions and requirements governing the issuance of wholesale liquor permits.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 379, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-314.1 — 48-314.3; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 52-54.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” throughout (a); and substituted “rule” for “regulations” in the last sentence of (b)(3) and in (d)(1).

3-4-607. Minimum wholesale liquor permit.

(a)(1)

A person other than a distiller, manufacturer, rectifier, or importer may apply to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a minimum wholesale liquor permit that allows the person to sell spirituous liquors, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), hard cider, and malt liquors at wholesale.

(2)

A minimum wholesale liquor permit holder shall not sell more than a combined total of twenty thousand (20,000) cases of spirituous liquors, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), hard cider, or malt liquors.

(3)

A case is a container that holds nine liters (9 l) of beverages.

(b)

The application shall be in writing and shall provide information concerning the applicant for the minimum wholesale liquor permit and the premises to be used by the applicant as the director requires.

(c)

The application shall be accompanied by a certified check, cash, or postal money order for the amount required by this section for the minimum wholesale liquor permit.

(d)

If the director grants the application, he or she shall issue a minimum wholesale liquor permit in a form as determined by the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(e)

The minimum wholesale liquor permit shall contain a description of the premises permitted and in form and substance shall be a minimum wholesale liquor permit to the person specifically designated to sell spirituous liquors, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), hard cider, and malt liquors for beverage purposes.

(f)(1)

A person other than a person holding a distiller's, manufacturer's, rectifier's, or minimum wholesale liquor permit shall not sell spirituous liquors, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), and malt liquors at wholesale.

(2)

A wholesaler holding a minimum wholesale liquor permit shall not sell or buy from another person unless the other person holds a minimum wholesale liquor permit, but a wholesaler may export from or import into this state spirituous liquors, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), hard cider, and malt liquors under rules promulgated by the division.

(g)

A wholesaler holding a minimum wholesale liquor permit shall not sell or contract to sell any spirituous liquors, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), hard cider, and malt liquors to a dispensary, hotel, restaurant, or club if the dispensary, hotel, restaurant, or club is not authorized under §3-4-601 to receive, possess, transport, distribute, or sell spirituous liquors, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), hard cider, and malt liquors.

(h)

A minimum wholesale liquor permitee of spirituous liquors, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), hard cider, and malt liquors in Arkansas shall purchase spirituous liquors, wine as defined in §3-9-301(7), hard cider, and malt liquors only from a distiller, importer, rectifier, or a domestic wine producer. However, this restriction does not apply to the purchase of native wines.

(i)(1)

The minimum wholesale liquor permit fee is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each separate establishment.

(2)

This section does not apply to residents of Arkansas who store, transport, and sell wine at wholesale manufactured by them in this state.

(j)

The provisions of §3-4-606 shall apply to a wholesaler who has a minimum wholesale liquor permit.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 7; 2019, No. 691, §§ 10, 11.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “hard cider” throughout (a) and (e)-(h); and made stylistic changes.

3-4-608. Spirituous liquor — Vinous liquor — Supplier registration.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Small farm wine” means the wine produced by a wine-making business that produces two hundred fifty thousand gallons (250,000 gals.) of wine or less per year, the alcohol content of which is not less than one-half percent (0.5%) and not more than twenty-one percent (21%);

(2)

“Spirituous” means a liquor distilled from the fermented juices of grain, fruits, or vegetables and containing more than twenty-one percent (21%) alcohol by weight, or any other liquids containing more than twenty-one percent (21%) alcohol by weight;

(3)

“Supplier” means an in-state or out-of-state manufacturer, distiller, rectifier, brewer, importer, or producer of spirituous liquor or vinous liquor; and

(4)

“Vinous” means the fermented juices of fruits or a mixture containing the fermented juices of fruits, containing more than five percent (5%) and not more than twenty-one percent (21%) alcohol by weight.

(b)(1)

A supplier of a spirituous or vinous beverage, excluding small farm wine, shall file an application with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a permit.

(2)

The application shall:

(A)

Be in writing;

(B)

Be verified; and

(C)

Set forth the information in detail as the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division requires concerning the applicant for the permit and premises to be used.

(3)

The application shall be accompanied by a permit fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) payable by cash, check, money order, or electronic payment.

(4)

The permit may be renewed annually.

(5)

If the director grants the application, he or she shall issue a permit in the form required by the rules established by the division.

(c)

A supplier shall not sell a spirituous liquor or a vinous liquor to a wholesaler, distributor, or to any other person who is not legally authorized to receive, possess, transport, distribute, or sell a spirituous liquor or a vinous liquor under this chapter.

(d)

Under the rules adopted by the director, a supplier may:

(1)

Sell, deliver, or transport to a wholesaler, distributor, or rectifier;

(2)

Ship into the state to a wholesaler, distributor, or rectifier; and

(3)

Export out of the state.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1105, § 2.

3-4-609. Wholesaler permit — Issuance — Transfer.

(a)(1)

A wholesaler permit shall not be issued under §3-4-605 or §3-4-607 on or after September 1, 2013.

(2)

However, a holder of a wholesaler permit under §3-4-605 or §3-4-607 issued on or before September 1, 2013, may renew the permit before, on, or after September 1, 2013.

(b)

A holder of a wholesaler permit issued under §3-4-605 or §3-4-607 on or before September 1, 2013, may transfer the wholesaler permit to another wholesaler as permitted under applicable law or regulation of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1434, § 1.

3-4-610. Layout center permit.

(a)

A corporation that is publicly traded on a nationally recognized stock exchange that has its principal place of business in Arkansas and is permitted to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises or off-premises consumption in Arkansas and other states may apply for a layout center permit.

(b)(1)

The application shall be in writing and shall provide information concerning the applicant for the layout center permit and the premises to be used by the applicant as the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division requires.

(2)

The permitted premises shall:

(A)

Be closed to the general public; and

(B)

Not be used for retail sales of alcoholic beverages.

(3)

A manufacturer or wholesaler may provide alcoholic beverages of any type directly to a layout center permittee at the permitted premises.

(4)

A manufacturer or wholesaler that provides alcoholic beverages under this section need not:

(A)

Be authorized to do business in this state; or

(B)

Have any type of license or permit to operate in the state.

(5)

The layout center permittee may also temporarily transport an alcoholic beverage to the permitted premises from a permitted retail outlet operated by the layout center permittee or the affiliates of the layout center permittee within the state.

(6)

An alcoholic beverage provided under this section need not:

(A)

Be available for sale in Arkansas; or

(B)

Possess a brand label approved for sale in this state.

(7)

A layout center permittee may:

(A)

Pay a manufacturer or wholesaler for:

(i)

The value of an alcoholic beverage; and

(ii)

The cost of delivering the alcoholic beverage; or

(B)

Provide or deliver the alcoholic beverage to the layout center permittee without charge.

(8)

An alcoholic beverage provided under this section shall:

(A)

Be used solely for the purpose of merchandise planning within the permitted premises; and

(B)

Not be consumed or sold on the permitted premises.

(9)

When a layout center permittee is finished using the product for merchandise planning, the layout center permittee:

(A)

For an alcoholic beverage received from a manufacturer, shall:

(i)

Destroy the alcoholic beverage;

(ii)

Return the alcoholic beverage to the manufacturer; or

(iii)

Donate the alcoholic beverage to a charitable organization qualified under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3);

(B)

For an alcoholic beverage received from a wholesaler, shall:

(i)

Destroy the alcoholic beverage; or

(ii)

Donate the alcoholic beverage to a charitable organization qualified under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3); or

(C)

For an alcoholic beverage temporarily transported from a permitted retail outlet operated by the layout center permittee or an affiliate of the layout center permittee, may return the alcoholic beverage to the retail outlet.

(10)

The layout center permittee shall maintain documentation of the receipt and disposition of all alcoholic beverages within the permitted premises.

(c)

Provision of alcoholic beverages by a manufacturer or wholesaler under this section or otherwise assisting the layout center permittee with merchandise planning at the permitted premises is not a gift, gratuity, or inducement to the layout center permittee or an affiliate of the layout center permittee.

(d)

An alcoholic beverage provided by a manufacturer or wholesaler under this section is exempt from taxation.

(e)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may conduct inspections of the premises permitted under this section.

(f)

The division shall assess an annual fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for a layout center permit.

(g)

Providing alcoholic beverages to a layout center permittee under this section is not a violation of any statute or regulation, including a regulation requiring a manufacturer or wholesaler to provide the same services to all retailers.

(h)

Owning, possessing, or transporting alcoholic beverages furnished or being furnished to a corporation under this section is not an offense under §3-3-401 et seq.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 726, § 2.

3-4-611. Hard cider manufacturing permit.

(a)

A person may apply to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a permit to manufacture, import, transport, store, and sell to a wholesaler, jobber, distributor, or retailer hard cider to be used and sold for beverage purposes as authorized under this section.

(b)

An application under this section shall:

(1)

Be in writing;

(2)

Be verified;

(3)

State in detail information concerning the applicant for the permit and the premises to be used by the applicant as required by the director; and

(4)

Be accompanied by a certified check, cash, or postal money order for the amount required in subsection (f) of this section for the permit.

(c)

If the director grants an application under this section, he or she shall issue the permit in a form prescribed by rule.

(d)

A permit under this section shall:

(1)

Contain a description of the premises to be used by the applicant; and

(2)

Permit the applicant to manufacture, transport, and sell to a wholesaler, jobber, distributor, or retailer hard cider in or from the premises specifically authorized under this section.

(e)

A hard cider manufacturer may:

(1)

Manufacture at its licensed facility no less than thirty-five percent (35%) of its hard cider to be sold in the state and no more than forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels per year;

(2)(A)

Sell, deliver, or transport hard cider manufactured by the hard cider manufacturer to, including without limitation:

(i)

Wholesalers;

(ii)

Retail license holders;

(iii)

Small brewery license holders;

(iv)

Small winery license holders;

(v)

Microbrewery-restaurant license holders; and

(vi)

Distillers.

(B)(i)

A hard cider manufacturer may only sell, deliver, or transport hard cider produced on the premises of the hard cider manufacturer under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section if the total production of the permitted hard cider manufacturer does not exceed fifteen thousand (15,000) barrels of hard cider per year from all facilities under common ownership with the hard cider manufacturer.

(ii)

Each permitted hard cider manufacturer shall submit documentation of production each year to renew the permit with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(iii)

A hard cider manufacturer may distribute no more than fifteen thousand (15,000) barrels per year.

(C)(i)

To sell and transport hard cider under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section, the hard cider manufacturing permit holder shall obtain a hard cider manufacturing wholesale permit.

(ii)

The hard cider manufacturing permit holder shall pay a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per year for the permit under subdivision (e)(2)(C)(i) of this section;

(3)(A)

Maintain one (1) separate manufacturing facility for the production or storage of hard cider as needed to meet demand, except that each facility used by the hard cider manufacturer permitee shall not in the aggregate produce more than forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels of hard cider per year.

(B)

Hard cider manufactured by a separate manufacturing facility of a hard cider manufacturing permittee shall be:

(i)

Sold to a licensed wholesaler; or

(ii)

Transported:

(a)

From the separate manufacturing facility to a facility commonly owned by the owner of the separate manufacturing facility for retail sale for consumption on or off the licensed premises; and

(b)

To the separate manufacturing facility from a facility commonly owned by the owner of the separate manufacturing facility for storage, production, or packaging;

(4)

Export hard cider manufactured by the manufacturer out of the state;

(5)

Sell for on-premises or off-premises consumption during legal operating hours hard cider manufactured by the manufacturer;

(6)

Serve on the premises:

(A)

Complimentary samples of hard cider manufactured by the manufacturer; and

(B)(i)

Spirituous liquors for on-premises consumption in a taproom under the license of a small brewery.

(ii)

Subdivision (e)(6)(B)(i) of this section authorizing on-premises consumption is effective only in cities and counties, or portions of cities and counties, in which the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquor is not prohibited as a result of a local option election held under Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209, and in which the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption has been approved by a majority vote at a referendum election as provided in this chapter;

(7)

Sell at retail, by the drink or by the package, hard cider manufactured by the manufacturer;

(8)

Sell for consumption on the premises of the manufacturer:

(A)

Hard cider manufactured by the manufacturer;

(B)

Hard cider that the manufacturer may purchase from wholesalers licensed by the state;

(C)

Wine;

(D)

Beer; and

(E)

Malt beverages;

(9)

Store beer, malt beverages, wine, and hard cider legally purchased for resale on the premises; and

(10)

Sell hard cider manufactured by the manufacturer at fairs and festivals with the permission and the consent of the management of the events if the sale occurs in a wet area and the hard cider sold is for consumption by persons of legal age.

(f)

For the privilege of manufacturing hard cider, each person engaged in manufacturing hard cider shall pay an annual permit fee of three hundred dollars ($300) for each manufacturing plant.

(g)

Hard cider may be sold for consumption on-premises or off-premises, or both, during all legal operating hours in which business is normally and legally conducted on the premises, if:

(1)

The manufacturer provides tours through its facility; and

(2)

Only sealed containers are removed from the premises.

(h)

A manufacturer may donate or sell for resale hard cider it manufactures to a charitable or nonprofit organization holding a valid temporary permit issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

(i)(1)

The division may authorize a manufacturer to conduct a hard cider-tasting event for educational or promotional purposes.

(2)(A)

Before an authorization is issued under subdivision (i)(1) of this section, the manufacturer shall provide written notice of the hard cider-tasting event at least two (2) weeks before the event.

(B)

A hard cider-tasting event under this subsection shall be held in any facility licensed by the division in a wet territory of this state.

(j)(1)

A hard cider manufacturer may transport its hard cider along any highway, road, street, or other thoroughfare of travel.

(2)

A hard cider manufacturer may ship hard cider it manufactures out of the state by common carrier or other appropriate parcel delivery service, and common carriers and other appropriate parcel delivery services may accept hard cider from Arkansas manufacturers for delivery outside the state.

(3)

A hard cider manufacturer in this state may ship hard cider it manufactures within the state by common carrier or other appropriate parcel delivery service, and common carriers and other appropriate parcel delivery services may accept hard cider from Arkansas manufacturers for delivery within the state if the hard cider is shipped only to persons holding a wholesale permit to purchase, store, sell, or dispense hard cider.

(k)(1)

A hard cider manufacturer may include a tap room at its facility and may:

(A)

Sell for both on-premises and off-premises consumption hard cider manufactured at the facility; and

(B)

Sell for on-premises consumption beer, hard cider, malt beverages, and wine not manufactured at the facility.

(2)

A hard cider manufacturer may operate a restaurant in conjunction with its tap room.

(l)(1)

A hard cider manufacturer selling and transporting hard cider manufactured on the premises of the facility is a supplier.

(2)

A hard cider manufacturer is not subject to §3-5-1101 et seq. unless the hard cider manufacturer exceeds annual production of hard cider of fifteen thousand (15,000) barrels.

(m)

The director shall adopt rules to implement and administer this section.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 691, § 1.

Subchapter 7

— Post Exchange Package Permit

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-4-701. Creation — Issuance — Expiration.

(a)(1)

In addition to all other existing alcoholic beverage permits authorized to be issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages, there is hereby created a “post exchange package permit”, which shall authorize the sales of spirituous, vinous, and malt beverages, light wine, light beer, premixed spirituous liquor, light spirituous liquor, and Arkansas native wine, as such beverages are defined by this title, at post exchange facilities located at Camp Joseph T. Robinson and Fort Chaffee upon property owned or controlled by the State of Arkansas and operated by and under the exclusive control of the militia.

(2)

The permit created herein shall not be subject to any quota restrictions.

(b)

The permits authorized in this section shall be issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division to qualified persons whose application for the permit shall be accompanied by a letter of authorization signed by the Adjutant General of the Arkansas National Guard.

(c)

Each permit shall be issued annually for a fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall expire on June 30 of each year.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 617, §§ 1-3; 1997, No. 366, § 1; 2009, No. 294, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (c), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000)” for “one hundred dollars ($100)” and made a minor stylistic change.

3-4-702. Hours of lawful sales — Purchase from wholesale distributors.

(a)

The hours of lawful sales under the post exchange package permit shall be the same as those established for military service clubs pursuant to §3-4-706.

(b)

All alcoholic beverages authorized to be sold under this title shall be purchased from wholesale distributors licensed by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 617, § 4; 2005, No. 1020, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “military service clubs pursuant to §3-4-706” for “other classes of off-premises retail permits pursuant to this title” in (a).

3-4-703. Authorized purchasers.

Sales of alcoholic beverages under the post exchange permit shall be limited to those persons over twenty-one (21) years of age who are:

(1)

Active or retired members of the Army National Guard and Air National Guard;

(2)

Active, retired, and reserve members of the United States Armed Forces;

(3)

United States Department of Defense employees;

(4)

Full-time employees of the militia;

(5)

Students attending training programs at Camp Joseph T. Robinson or Fort Chaffee;

(6)

Contractors and their employees performing work pursuant to a contract with the United States or the State of Arkansas on Camp Joseph T. Robinson or Fort Chaffee;

(7)

Employees of tenant government agencies located on Camp Joseph T. Robinson or Fort Chaffee; and

(8)

Dependents of the above-named persons who hold identification cards evidencing their status as may be found acceptable to the Adjutant General.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 617, § 5; 1995, No. 521, § 2; 1997, No. 1201, § 13.

Cross References.

Canteen — Inventory and sales — Tax exemptions, §12-63-406.

Legislative findings of fact, §
12-63-102.

3-4-704. Rules.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division is authorized to adopt reasonable rules to carry out the intent and provisions of this subchapter, to establish appropriate application forms, permit forms, and procedures, and to do any and all other things necessary to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 617, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 55.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading and in the section.

3-4-705. Unauthorized sales — Penalties.

Any unauthorized sales pursuant to the permit created herein shall be subject to the same penalties as established for other off-premises retail permits pursuant to this title.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 617, § 7.

3-4-706. Military service club mixed drink permit.

(a)

In addition to the post exchange and other post operations authorized to be taken over by the militia pursuant to the provisions of this section, the Adjutant General of the Arkansas National Guard is given further authority to take over operation of all military service clubs on Fort Chaffee.

(b)(1)

It is recognized that Fort Chaffee has operated under exclusive federal jurisdiction and that such military service clubs have not been required to obtain a license from the State of Arkansas to authorize such operations.

(2)

However, pursuant to resumption of state jurisdiction over Fort Chaffee, state licenses will be required.

(c)(1)

Therefore, there is hereby created a military service club mixed drink permit authorizing the sale of alcoholic beverages as defined in §3-9-202 to be issued to service clubs on military reservations owned or controlled by the State of Arkansas.

(2)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division is authorized to issue such a permit to each military service club operating on Fort Chaffee.

(3)(A)

The annual fee for each military service club mixed drink permit shall be seven hundred fifty dollars ($750), and the annual fee shall be due and collected in the same manner as all other permit fees collected by the division.

(B)

Food service requirements for restaurants, as set out in §3-9-202 et seq. shall not be applicable.

(C)

Hours of operation for such service clubs shall be the same as are now in existence for private clubs licensed pursuant to §3-9-221 et seq.

(4)

The division is authorized to adopt reasonable rules to provide for the operation of such service clubs consistent with the intent and purposes of this section.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1201, § 15; 2009, No. 294, § 9; 2019, No. 315, § 56.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (c)(3)(A), substituted “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750)” for “five hundred dollars ($500)” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c)(4).

Cross References.

Legislative findings of fact, §
12-63-102.

Military service club, §12-63-501 et seq.

Subchapter 8

— Responsible Permittee Programs

3-4-801. Legislative intent and purpose.

The legislative intent and purpose of this subchapter is to:

(1)

Eliminate the sale of alcoholic beverages to and consumption of alcoholic beverages by underage persons;

(2)

Reduce intoxication and to reduce accidents, injuries, and deaths in the state which are related to intoxication; and

(3)

Encourage alcoholic beverage permit holders to be prudent in the sale and service of alcoholic beverages.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 173, § 1.

3-4-802. Definitions.

The following words or phrases or the plural of those words or phrases shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)

“Board” means the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board of the State of Arkansas; and

(2)

“Permittee” means a person who is licensed by the board to sell or dispense alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption or for off-premises consumption, or both.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 173, § 2.

3-4-803. Responsible permittee program.

(a)(1)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall oversee a server training program designed to encourage permittees and their employees to treat the sale and service of alcoholic beverages in a responsible manner.

(2)

To that end, the board shall adopt rules which shall implement the intent of this subchapter.

(b)

The program shall be entitled “the responsible permittee program”.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 173, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 57.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(2).

3-4-804. Effect of compliance.

(a)

A permittee who seeks to qualify as a responsible permittee must provide to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board evidence of compliance with the requirements of this subchapter. Upon satisfactory proof that the permittee has complied with the requirements, the board shall certify the permittee as a responsible permittee. Certification as a responsible permittee shall be renewed annually.

(b)

The board may revoke or suspend a permittee's certification for noncompliance with this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 173, § 4.

3-4-805. Certification.

In order to qualify for certification, the permittee shall comply with the following requirements:

(1)

Attend a course of instruction approved and certified by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board which shall include subjects dealing with alcoholic beverages as follows:

(A)

Education on the dangers of drinking and driving;

(B)

State laws regarding the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption or for off-premises consumption, or both;

(C)

Methods of recognizing and dealing with underage customers;

(D)

The development of specific procedures for:

(i)

Refusing to sell alcoholic beverages to underage customers;

(ii)

Assisting employees in dealing with underage customers;

(iii)

Dealing with intoxicated customers; and

(E)

Such other matters as may be deemed appropriate by the board;

(2)

Require each employee who is authorized to sell alcoholic beverages in the normal course of his or her employment to complete the responsible permittee training course set out in subdivision (1) of this section within thirty (30) days of commencing employment; and

(3)

Maintain employment records of the training of its employees required by this section.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 173, § 5.

3-4-806. Mitigation of fines or penalties.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall consider certification of a permittee in the responsible permittee program in mitigation of administrative penalties or fines for a permittee's or employee's violation of state laws and rules relating to the sale of alcoholic beverages.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 173, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 58.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

3-4-807. Fees.

(a)

There is imposed on each permittee who applies and is certified as a responsible permittee an annual fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

(b)(1)

All moneys collected under this subchapter shall be used to fund such server training programs as may be approved by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

(2)

Permittees attending such approved programs shall not be charged any additional fee by the program provider.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 173, § 7.

Subchapter 9

— Caterer's Permit

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-4-901. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)

“Alcoholic beverages” means any alcoholic beverage which is sold at retail in Arkansas;

(2)

“Director” means the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division;

(3)

“Off-premise caterer” means an individual or business entity which:

(A)

Has been in business for more than one (1) year;

(B)

Sixty percent (60%) or more of whose gross sales for the preceding year have been derived from food sales;

(C)

Had gross food sales in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the preceding year;

(D)

For a fee, prepares food and beverages to be consumed at private parties or other private functions; and

(E)

Transports the food and beverages from the permitted premises to the premises where the private function is being held; and

(4)

“Off-premise caterer's permit” means a license which authorizes the holder thereof to purchase alcoholic beverages from a permitted retail outlet, to transport the alcoholic beverages to a private function which is being catered by the permit holder, and to serve alcoholic beverages to attendees of a private function in conjunction with catered food.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1170, § 1.

3-4-902. Off-premise caterer's permit.

(a)

There is hereby created an off-premise caterer's permit which may be issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division to qualified off-premise caterers as defined in this subchapter.

(b)

The annual fee for an off-premises caterer's permit shall be five hundred dollars ($500), and the off-premises caterer's permit shall be renewed on an annual basis.

(c)

The off-premise caterer's permit shall be posted conspicuously at the caterer's place of business.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1170, § 2; 2009, No. 294, § 10.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (b), substituted “five hundred dollars ($500)” for “two hundred dollars ($200)” and made minor stylistic changes.

3-4-903. Qualifications for permit.

(a)

No off-premise caterer's permit shall be issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division until an applicant for the permit provides proof that it has obtained a sales tax permit from the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration and has received approval of its permitted premises by the Department of Health.

(b)

Furthermore, no off-premise caterer's permit shall be issued until the applicant provides proof of general liability insurance providing coverage in an amount of no less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1170, § 3.

3-4-904. Gross receipts tax.

Gross receipts tax shall be collected and remitted by the off-premise caterer on the total fee charged for each catered event.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1170, § 2.

3-4-905. Rules and forms.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division is authorized to adopt reasonable rules implementing and facilitating the purpose and intent of this subchapter, to establish appropriate application forms, permit forms, and procedures, and to do any and all other things necessary to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1170, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 59.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Rules” for “Regulations” in the section heading; and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section.